Washington statutes.
RCW 19.108.060

Actions for misappropriation—Time limitation.

An action for misappropriation must be brought within three years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

[ 1981 c 286 s 6.]